sv: Resväskor och väskor > Tillbehör till resväskor: Fodral och inlägg för torrlådor; Ryggsäcksskydd; Hyllor och ställningar för bagage; Väskremmar; Väsketiketter; Packningsorganiserare; Flaskor och behållare för resor; Pengabälten
en: Luggage & Bags > Luggage Accessories: Dry Box Liners & Inserts; Luggage Covers; Luggage Racks & Stands; Luggage Straps; Luggage Tags; Packing Organizers; Travel Bottles & Containers; Travel Pouches
sl-SI: Prtljaga in torbe > Dodatki za prtljago: Podloge in vstavki za škatle za suho shranjevanje; Prevleke za prtljago; Nosilci in stojala za prtljago; Pasovi za prtljago; Oznake za prtljago; Organizatorji prtljage; Potovalne steklenice in posode; Potovalne torbice
ro-RO: Bagaje și genți > Accesorii pentru bagaje: Căptușeli și inserții pentru compartimente impermeabile; Huse pentru bagaje; Grilaje și suporturi pentru bagaje; Curele pentru bagaje; Etichetă pentru bagaje; Organizatoare pentru bagaje; Sticle și recipiente de voiaj; Pungi de voiaj
tr: Bavullar ve Çantalar > Bavul Aksesuarları: Korumalı Kap Düzenleyicileri ve Bölme Ekleri; Bavul Örtüleri; Bagaj Rafları ve Sehpaları; Bavul Kayışları; Bavul Etiketleri; Bavul Düzenleyicileri; Seyahat Şişe ve Kapları; Seyahat Keseleri
th: กระเป๋า > อุปกรณ์กระเป๋าเดินทาง: ไส้ในกล่องกันความชื้น; ผ้าคลุมกระเป๋าเดินทาง; ชั้นและที่ตั้งกระเป๋าเดินทาง; สายรัดกระเป๋าเดินทาง; แท็กกระเป๋าเดินทาง; ที่จัดระเบียบการแพ็ค; ขวดและภาชนะสำหรับเดินทาง; กระเป๋าคาดสำหรับเดินทาง
ko: 여행용 가방/가방 > 여행용 가방 부대용품: 제습 보관함 깔개/칸막이; 여행용 가방 커버; 여행용 가방 선반/스탠드; 여행용 가방 스트랩; 여행용 가방 태그; 여행용 정리함; 여행용 공병/용기; 여행용 파우치
es: Maletas y bolsos de viaje > Accesorios de equipaje: Accesorios y revestimientos para contenedores impermeables; Fundas para mochilas; Portaequipajes y bases para maletas; Correas para equipaje; Etiquetas para equipaje; Organizadores de equipaje; Botellas y contenedores de viaje; Bolsos de viaje
pl: Torby, walizki i akcesoria podróżne > Akcesoria podróżne: Wyściółki i wkładki do futerałów; Ochraniacze na plecaki; Stojaki i podstawki na bagaż; Troki; Identyfikatory do bagażu; Organizery podróżne; Butelki i pojemniki podróżne; Dyskretne saszetki
ja: 旅行用かばん・バッグ > 旅行用かばん・バッグ関連用品: ドライボックス用ライナー・仕切り; リュックサック・バックパック用カバー; バゲージラック; スーツケースベルト; スーツケース用ネームタグ; 旅行用荷造りグッズ; 旅行用詰め替え容器; トラベルポーチ
it: Bagagli e borse > Accessori bagagli: Inserti e rivestimenti per contenitori stagni; Coperture per bagagli; Portabagagli; Cinghie per bagagli; Etichette per bagagli; Organizer per bagagli; Contenitori e bottiglie da viaggio; Borse da viaggio
nb: Bagasje og vesker > Bagasjetilbehør: Tørrboksinnlegg og -trekk; Bagasjetrekk; Bagasjestativer og -hyller; Bagasjestropper; Bagasjemerker; Pakkeorganisering; Reiseflasker og -beholdere; Reiseposer
el: Αποσκευές & τσάντες > Αξεσουάρ αποσκευών: Εσωτερικά & επενδύσεις κουτιών; Καλύμματα αποσκευών; Ράφια & βάσεις αποσκευών; Ιμάντες αποσκευών; Ετικέτες αποσκευών; Οργανωτές συσκευασίας; Μπουκάλια & δοχεία ταξιδιού; Θήκες ταξιδιού
zh-CN: 箱包 > 箱包配件: 防潮盒内衬/衬垫; 行李箱/包保护套; 行李架; 行李箱绑带; 行李挂牌; 居家旅行收纳包; 旅行分装瓶/容器; 旅行贴身包/护照包
ru: Дорожные чемоданы и сумки > Аксессуары для дорожных чемоданов и сумок: Вкладыши и вставки для водонепроницаемых контейнеров; Чехлы для чемоданов и сумок; Подставки для чемоданов и сумок; Ремни для чемоданов и сумок; Багажные бирки; Органайзеры для чемоданов и сумок; Дорожные бутылки и контейнеры; Дорожные сумки
lt-LT: Bagažas ir krepšiai > Bagažo priedai: Neperšlampamų dėžučių įdėklai; Bagažo apvalkalai; Bagažo lentynos ir stovai; Bagažo dirželiai; Bagažo etiketės; Pakavimo pagalbinės priemonės; Kelioniniai buteliai ir konteineriai; Kelioniniai maišeliai
nl: Bagage en tassen > Bagageaccessoires: Binnenhoezen en inzetstukken voor waterdichte opbergboxen; Koffer- en rugzakhoezen; Bagagerekken en -houders; Bagageriemen; Bagagelabels; Bagagehoezen; Reisflessen en -flacons; Reistasjes
de: Taschen & Gepäck > Gepäckzubehör: Folien & Einsätze für Trockenboxen; Rucksack-Schutzhüllen; Kofferablagen; Koffergurte; Gepäckanhänger; Gepäck-Organizer; Reisebehälter; Reisedokumententaschen
zh-TW: 行李箱/袋 > 旅行箱配件: 防潮箱內襯; 行李保護套; 行李架; 行李束帶; 行李吊牌; 行李收納袋; 旅行用瓶罐容器; 旅行收納袋
fr: Bagages et maroquinerie > Accessoires pour bagages: Revêtements intérieurs et compartiments pour boîtes étanches; Housses pour bagages; Porte-bagages; Sangles pour bagages; Étiquettes pour bagages; Rangements pour bagages; Flacons de voyage; Pochettes de voyage
fi: Laukut ja matkalaukut > Matkatavaratarvikkeet: Kuivalaatikoiden sisustat ja suojat; Matkalaukkusuojat; Matkalaukkutelineet; Matkalaukun hihnat; Matkalaukkutunnisteet; Laukunjärjestäjät; Matkapullot ja -astiat; Matkapussukat
cs: Tašky a zavazadla > Zavazadla – příslušenství: Výplně vodotěsných kufrů; Obaly na batohy; Stojany na zavazadla; Pásky k zavazadlům; Visačky na zavazadla; Pomůcky pro přehledné balení; Cestovní láhve a nádoby; Cestovní kapsičky
sk-SK: Batožina a tašky > Príslušenstvo k batožine: Vložky a podložky do vodotesných obalov; Obaly na batožinu; Stojany a držiaky na batožinu; Popruhy na batožinu; Štítky na batožinu; Cestovné organizéry; Cestovné fľaše a nádoby; Cestovné vrecká
hr-HR: Prtljaga i torbe > Pribor za prtljagu: Oblozi i umetci za suhe sanduke; Navlake za prtljagu; Police i stalci za prtljagu; Trake za prtljagu; Oznake za prtljagu; Organizatori pakiranja; Putne boce i spremnici; Putne torbice
da: Kufferter og tasker > Kufferter – tilbehør: Foring og indlæg til luft- og vandtætte beholdere; Covers til rygsække; Kuffertstativer; Kuffertremme; Kuffertmærker; Kuffertinddelere; Rejseflasker og -beholdere; Rejsemapper
hu: Poggyász és táskák > Poggyászkiegészítők: Szárazdoboz-bélések és -betétek; Poggyászvédők; Poggyászállványok; Poggyászpántok; Poggyászcímkék; Csomagolásszervezők; Utazási palackok és tárolók; Utazótasakok
vi: Hành lý và túi xách > Phụ kiện hành lý: Lớp lót và khuôn xốp dùng cho hộp đựng đồ khô; Bọc hành lý; Giá đỡ hành lý; Dây đai buộc hành lý; Thẻ tên hành lý; Bộ chia hành lý; Chai lọ du lịch; Túi du lịch
pt-BR: Malas e bolsas > Acessórios para malas: Forros e espumas para caixas impermeáveis; Capas de proteção para mochilas; Suportes para malas; Alças de bagagem; Etiquetas de bagagem; Organizadores de embalagem; Garrafas e recipientes de viagem; Bolsas de viagens
pt-PT: Bagagem e malas > Acessórios de bagagem: Revestimentos e encaixes para sacos impermeáveis; Coberturas para bagagem; Prateleiras e suportes para bagagem; Faixas para bagagem; Etiquetas para bagagem; Organizadores de malas; Garrafas e recipientes de viagem; Bolsas de viagem
bg-BG: Куфари и чанти > Аксесоари за куфари: Вътрешност и прегради за водоустойчиви кутии за съхранение; Покривала за куфари; Поставки и стойки за куфари; Колани за куфари; Етикети за куфари; Органайзери за опаковане; Бутилки и контейнери за пътуване; Несесери